New Jersey, session 221, A229.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 3 of P.L.1964, c.48 (54:4-23.3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    Land shall be deemed to be in agricultural use when devoted to the production for sale of plants and animals useful to man, including but not limited to:  forages and sod crops; grains and feed crops; dairy animals and dairy products; poultry and poultry products; livestock, including beef cattle, sheep, swine, horses, ponies, mules or goats, including the breeding, boarding, raising, rehabilitating, training or grazing of any or all of such animals, except that "livestock" shall not include dogs; bees and apiary products; fur animals; trees and forest products; or when devoted to and meeting the requirements and qualifications for payments or other compensation pursuant to a soil conservation program under an agreement with an agency of the federal government, except that land which is devoted exclusively to the production for sale of tree and forest products, other than Christmas trees, or devoted as sustainable forestland, and is not appurtenant woodland, shall not be deemed to be in agricultural use unless the landowner fulfills the following additional conditions: a.     The landowner establishes and complies with the provisions of a forest stewardship plan for this land, approved by the Department of Environmental Protection pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2009, c.256 (C.13:1L-31), or a woodland management plan for this land, prepared in accordance with policies, guidelines and practices approved by the Division of Parks and Forestry in the Department of Environmental Protection, in consultation with the Department of Agriculture and the Dean of Cook College at Rutgers, The State University, which policies, guidelines and practices are designed to eliminate excessive and unnecessary cutting; b.    The landowner, and a forester from a list of foresters approved by the Department of Environmental Protection or other professional from a list of other professionals authorized by the department in consultation with the forest stewardship advisory committee established pursuant to section 8 of P.L.2009, c.256 (C.13:1L-36), annually attest to compliance with subsection a. of this section; and c.     The landowner annually submits an application, as prescribed in section 13 of P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.13), to the assessor, accompanied by a copy of the plan established pursuant to subsection a. of this section; written documentation of compliance with subsection b. of this section; a supplementary woodland data form setting forth woodland management actions taken in the pre-tax year, the type and quantity of tree and forest products sold, and the amount of income received or anticipated for same; a map of the land showing the location of the activity and the soil group classes of the land; and other pertinent information required by the Director of the Division of Taxation as part of the application for valuation, assessment and taxation, as provided in P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.1 et seq.). The landowner shall, at the same time, submit to the Commissioner of the Department of Environmental Protection an exact copy of the application and accompanying information submitted to the assessor pursuant to this subsection. The requirements of subsections a. through c. of this section shall not apply to the production of a crop designated as a specialty crop by the United States Department of Agriculture.  Forested land or woodlands shall be deemed to be in agricultural use when devoted to the production for sale of a specialty crop, including, but not limited to, the production of maple syrup from sap collected from trees grown and maintained on the forested lands or woodlands.  The landowner producing a specialty crop on forested land or woodlands shall not be required to submit a woodland management plan for the forested lands or woodlands as part of the application for farmland assessment.  The landowner shall annually submit an application, as prescribed in section 13 of P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.13), to the assessor, accompanied with written documentation of the production of a specialty crop on the lands, the designation of the specialty crop as such by the United States Department of Agriculture, the type and quantity of the specialty crop produced and sold, and the amount of income received or anticipated for the same. For the purposes of this amendatory and supplementary act, "appurtenant woodland" means a wooded piece of property which is contiguous to, part of, or beneficial to a tract of land, which tract of land has a minimum area of at least five acres devoted to agricultural or horticultural uses other than the production for sale of trees and forest products, exclusive of Christmas trees, to which tract of land the woodland is supportive and subordinate. For the purposes of section 7 of P.L.2009, c.213 and P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.1 et seq.): (1)   agricultural use shall also include biomass, solar, or wind energy generation, provided that the biomass, solar, or wind energy generation is consistent with the provisions of P.L.2009, c.213 (C.4:1C-32.4 et al.), as applicable, and the rules and regulations adopted therefor; and (2)   "biomass" means an agricultural crop, crop residue, or agricultural byproduct that is cultivated, harvested, or produced on the farm, or directly obtained from a farm where it was cultivated, harvested, or produced, and which can be used to generate energy in a sustainable manner, except with respect to preserved farmland, "biomass" means the same as that term is defined in section 1 of P.L.2009, c.213 (C.4:1C-32.4). (cf:  P.L.2009, c.256, s.13) 2.  Section 5 of P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.5) is amended to read as follows: 5.  a.  Except as otherwise provided in subsection d. of this section, land, five acres in area, shall be deemed to be actively devoted to agricultural or horticultural use when the amount of the gross sales of agricultural or horticultural products produced thereon, including a crop designated as a specialty crop by the United States Department of Agriculture, any payments received under a soil conservation program, fees received for breeding, raising or grazing any livestock, income imputed to cropland pastured and permanent pasture land used for grazing in the amount determined by the State Farmland Evaluation Committee created pursuant to section 20 of P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.20), and fees received for boarding, rehabilitating or training any livestock where the land under the boarding, rehabilitating or training facilities is contiguous to land which otherwise qualifies for valuation, assessment and taxation under P.L.1964, c.48, have averaged at least $1,000 per year during the two-year period immediately preceding the tax year in issue, or there is clear evidence of anticipated yearly gross sales, payments, fees, and imputed income amounting to at least $1,000 within a reasonable period of time, or such amount as may be established by the State Farmland Evaluation Committee pursuant to this section.  In the case of woodland subject to a woodland management plan pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.3), the amount shall be at least $500, or such amount as may be established by the State Farmland Evaluation Committee pursuant to this section.  Every three years, or sooner at the call of the Secretary of Agriculture or the Director of the Division of Taxation, the State Farmland Evaluation Committee shall review the minimum gross sales, payments, fees, and imputed income requirements, and anticipated yearly gross sales, payments, fees, and imputed income requirements, established in this section for the first five acres, and may, by rule or regulation adopted pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), raise the amounts of those minimums to such levels as the committee determines appropriate.  Any increase made to the minimum gross sales, payments, fees, and imputed income requirements, and anticipated yearly gross sales, payments, fees and imputed income requirements, for the first five acres as authorized pursuant to this section shall not be enforced until the third tax year following adoption of the increase. In addition, where the land is more than five acres in area, it shall be deemed to be actively devoted to agricultural or horticultural use when the amount of the gross sales of agricultural or horticultural products, including a crop designated as a specialty crop by the United States Department of Agriculture, produced on the area above five acres, any payments received under a soil conservation program, fees received for breeding, raising or grazing any livestock, income imputed to cropland pastured and permanent pasture land used for grazing in the amount determined by the State Farmland Evaluation Committee created pursuant to section 20 of P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.20), and fees received for boarding, rehabilitating or training any livestock where the land under the boarding, rehabilitating or training facilities is contiguous to land which otherwise qualifies for valuation, assessment and taxation under P.L.1964, c.48, have averaged at least $5.00 per acre per year during the two-year period immediately preceding the tax year in issue, or there is clear evidence of anticipated yearly gross sales, payments, fees, and imputed income amounting to an average of at least $5.00 per year within a reasonable period of time; except in the case of woodland and wetland, where the minimum requirement shall be an average of $0.50 per acre on the area above five acres. In addition, in order for land to be deemed to be actively devoted to agricultural or horticultural use, the activity and use must be consistent with the guidelines describing generally accepted agricultural and horticultural practices developed and adopted pursuant to subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.2013, c.43 (C.54:4-23.3d). As used in this section, "livestock" shall not include dogs. For the purposes of this section, the presence of an intervening public thoroughfare shall not preclude a finding of contiguity. b. (1) Land previously qualified as actively devoted to agricultural or horticultural use under P.L.1964, c.48, but failing to meet the additional requirement on acreage above five acres, shall not be subject to the roll-back tax because of such disqualification, but shall be treated as land for which an annual application has not been submitted, provided that the land remains in agricultural or horticultural use. (2)   Land previously qualified as actively devoted to agricultural or horticultural use under P.L.1964, c.48, but failing to meet any increase in the minimum amount of gross sales, payments and fees received, and imputed income requirements, and anticipated yearly gross sales, payments, fees, and imputed income requirements, established pursuant to subsection a. of this section, shall not be subject to the roll-back tax because of such disqualification, but shall be treated as land for which an annual application has not been submitted, provided that the land remains in agricultural or horticultural use. (3)   Land qualified as actively devoted to agricultural or horticultural use as of the day before the date of enactment of P.L.2013, c.43 (C.54:4-23.3d et al.) due to the use of payments or other compensation received under a soil conservation program agreement with any agency of the federal government, but which payments or other compensation do not meet the minimum amounts required pursuant to subsection a. of this section as amended by P.L.2013, c.43 (C.54:4-23.3d et al.), shall continue to be deemed to be actively devoted to agricultural or horticultural use for purposes of valuation, assessment and taxation under P.L.1964, c.48 until the end of the soil conservation program agreement period. c.     In determining the eligibility of land for valuation, assessment and taxation pursuant to P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.1 et seq.), the assessor of the taxing district in which the land is located shall, upon request by the owner of the land, exempt the owner from the income requirements of this section if the owner demonstrates to the satisfaction of the assessor that the failure to meet the income requirements was due to an injury, illness or death of the person responsible for performing the activities which produce the income necessary to meet the income eligibility requirement of this section. The request of the owner shall be accompanied by a certificate of a physician stating that the person was physically incapacitated or by a certified copy of the death certificate, as the case may be.  The assessor may only grant an exemption once for a particular illness, injury or death. d.    The gross sales, payments, fees, and imputed income received pursuant to the requirements of this section shall not apply to land that (1) is the subject of a forest stewardship plan approved by the Department of Environmental Protection pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2009, c.256 (C.13:1L-31) which is fully implemented, and (2) otherwise qualifies under the "Farmland Assessment Act of 1964," P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.1 et seq.), for valuation, assessment and taxation as land in agricultural or horticultural use pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.3). (cf:  P.L.2013, c.43, s.2) 3.  This act shall take effect immediately.